Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1275.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Official Pennsylvania March Designation.Section 2. Designation of the official march of the Commonwealth.The Pennsylvania March is selected, designated and adopted as the official march of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.The composition of the Pennsylvania March shall be published by the Legislative Reference Bureau in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 30 days of the effective date of this section.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1275PN1428 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920